Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1816
Inspection fee; estimate, how obtained; compulsory potato inspection; establishment; termination.

Any person, for the purpose of obtaining information relative to the cost of potato inspection and grading services for a designated area, may request in writing that an estimate be prepared by the director of the costs of such a service. The director may establish an estimated inspection fee based upon the inspector's salary, mileage and other travel expenses, cost of inspection certificates, and other necessary expenses to cover the inspection service and the administration thereof.

To establish compulsory inspection of commercial shipments of potatoes in a designated area, a petition, signed by potato growers representing fifty-one percent or more of the commercial potato acreage of the last preceding crop year, with an estimate of inspection costs attached, may be presented to the director requesting that all commercial shipments of potatoes originating in the designated area be officially inspected and graded by the department at the point of origin or at locations approved by the director. The director shall fix a time and place for hearing on the petition and shall publish notice thereof in a newspaper having general circulation in the area designated in the petition for three consecutive weeks. At the time and place established by such notice, the director or the director's designate shall hold a public hearing upon the petition at which time evidence will be taken in support of or in opposition to the petition. If the evidence reveals that potato growers representing fifty-one percent or more of the commercial potato acreage of the last preceding crop year are in favor of the compulsory program set forth in the petition request, the director shall enter an order establishing compulsory inspection of commercial shipments of potatoes in the area designated in the petition. A petition to terminate compulsory inspection, signed by potato growers representing fifty-one percent or more of the commercial potato acreage of the last preceding crop year, may be filed with the director at any time and such petition shall be set for public hearing in the manner provided in this section. If the director finds from the evidence submitted at such hearing to terminate inspection services that the petition to terminate represents fifty-one percent or more of the commercial potato acreage of the last preceding crop year, the director shall enter an order declaring that compulsory potato inspection is terminated. In order to determine the commercial potato acreage of the last preceding crop year, the director shall use the tabulated crop acreage reports of the county assessors, compiled by the state-federal division of agricultural statistics.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 8, p. 188;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 2.
July 1, 2026